Arkansas, session 2025, SB151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-1-301, concerning the definitions used
in the forfeiture of retirement benefits, is amended to add additional
subdivisions to read as follows:
(3)(A) "Benefit" means a monthly payment made to a retirant or
the beneficiary of a member or retirant by a retirement system.
(B) "Benefit" does not include employee contributions to a
retirement system;
(4) "Member" means a person who is included in the membership of
a retirement system;
(5)(A) "Public office" means an office created by or under the
authority of the laws of the State of Arkansas or a subdivision thereof that
is filled by a person who is elected by the voters of the State of Arkansas.
*LJH110*
03-31-2025 11:05:56 LJH110

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB151
(B) "Public office" does not include an office created by
or under the authority of any federal law;
(6) "Public trust crime" means a crime prohibited under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 9; and
(7) "Retirant" means a member who retires with a benefit payable
from funds of a retirement system.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-1-302 is amended to read as follows:
24-1-302. Forfeiture of benefits.
(a)(1) A member or retirant forfeits his or her right to benefit
payments under a retirement system if he or she pleads guilty or nolo
contendere to or is found guilty of a public trust crime while holding public
office in this state.
(2) A beneficiary forfeits his or her right to benefit payments
under a retirement system if he or she:
(A) Is convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of
the unlawful killing of the member or retirant Pleads guilty or nolo
contendere to or is found guilty of the unlawful killing of a member or
retirant; or
(B) Pleads guilty or nolo contendere to the unlawful
killing of the member or retirant Pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is
found guilty of a public trust crime while holding public office in this
state, unless he or she is participating in a retirement system defined under
§ 24-1-301(2)(F);
(C) Is found liable by a court of competent jurisdiction
for the unlawful killing of the member or retirant by a preponderance of the
evidence in a civil action;
(D) Is acquitted by a court of competent jurisdiction for
the unlawful killing of the member or retirant by reason of insanity, mental
defect or disease, or any other mental incapacity; or
(E) Is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to lack
the capacity to understand or effectively assist in defending a criminal
proceeding against him or her for the unlawful killing of the member or
retirant.
(2)(3)(A) If a retirement system finds that a member, retirant,
or beneficiary has forfeited his or her right to benefit payments from the
03-31-2025 11:05:56 LJH110

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB151
retirement system under subdivision (a)(1) subsection (a) of this section,
the retirement system shall treat the beneficiary as if he or she is
deceased:
(i) and shall not Not make benefit payments to the
member, retirant, or beneficiary.; and
(ii) Refund the employee contributions accumulated
with interest as defined by the retirement system that were made by the
member or retirant to the retirement system to:
(a) The member or retirant; or
(b) If deceased, the estate of the member or
retirant if the member or retirant does not have a contingent beneficiary who
may receive benefit payments under this section.
(B) If a retirant is already receiving benefits, then his
or her employee contributions, less benefits received by the retirant through
the retirement system, shall be refunded to him or her in full.
(4)(A) A retirement system may make the refund of employee
contributions accumulated with interest as defined by the retirement system
to a member or retirant by a:
(i) Lump-sum payment to the member or retirant; or
(ii) Series of monthly payments to the member or
retirant in amounts equal to the amount the individual paid in to the
retirement system with an interest rate as defined by the retirement system.
(B) A retirement system shall make the refund of employee
contributions to the estate of a member or retirant by a lump-sum payment to
the estate of the member or retirant.
(C) Payments made under subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this
section shall cease when the member or retirant is fully reimbursed for his
or her employee contributions paid in to the retirement system with an
interest rate as defined by the retirement system.
(b)(1) If a member, retirant, or beneficiary appeals his or her
conviction for an offense described under subdivision (a)(1) subdivision
(a)(1) or (a)(2) of this section, benefit payments shall not be paid to the
member, retirant, or beneficiary unless the appeal results in a reversal of
the conviction.
(2)(A) If the conviction of a member, retirant, or beneficiary
for an offense described under subdivision (a)(1) subdivision (a)(1) or
03-31-2025 11:05:56 LJH110

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB151
(a)(2) of this section is reversed, the retirement system may make benefit
payments to the member, retirant, or beneficiary upon repayment of
accumulated contributions with interest to the system.
(B) If the conviction of a member, retirant, or
beneficiary for an offense described under subdivision (a)(1) subdivision
(a)(1) or (a)(2) of this section is affirmed, the retirement system shall not
make benefit payments to the member, retirant, or beneficiary.
(c) If a member or retirant does not have a contingent beneficiary who
may receive benefit payments under this section, the member or retirant's
contributions to the retirement system shall be refunded to the estate of the
member or retirant.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that this act not be construed
to apply retroactively to a vested member or retirant of a retirement system,
and shall only apply to a member whose rights have not yet vested in the
system as of the effective date of this act.

/s/M. Johnson

















03-31-2025 11:05:56 LJH110